Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2618
Sales of cattle; contracts allowed; conditions.

Section 54-2617 does not apply to any contract to purchase cattle for slaughter if the following conditions are met:

(1) The contract to purchase cattle for slaughter specifies the month of delivery and allows the seller to set the week for delivery within such month; and

(2) The packer reports the contract information as required under section 54-2623, including specified delivery dates or times.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 18.